Maine, session 132, LD1155.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4, as amended by PL 1975, c. 771, §26, is repealed and the
following enacted in its place:
§4. Dedimus justices
1. Appointment. The Governor shall appoint in each county persons who are
designated as dedimus justices, before whom the oath required by the Constitution of
Maine to qualify civil officers may be taken and subscribed. Such persons shall exercise
their powers and duties and must be commissioned to act within and for each county as
follows.
A. Two persons in each county that are county employees must be appointed as
dedimus justices so that these persons may exercise the powers and duties of dedimus
justice on behalf of county government.
B. One person in each county that is an employee of the county sheriff must be
appointed as dedimus justice so that this person may exercise the powers and duties of
dedimus justice on behalf of the county sheriff.
2. Verification; roster. The Secretary of State shall maintain a roster of those persons
designated as dedimus justices pursuant to subsection 1 and make the roster available on
the Secretary of State's publicly accessible website. On an annual basis, the Secretary of
State shall contact a person designated as a dedimus justice for the purpose of verifying
that the person is willing and able to fulfill the duties of dedimus justice as described in
subsection 1. If, after attempts in 2 consecutive years, the Secretary of State is unable to
verify that a person designated as a dedimus justice is willing and able to fulfill the duties
of dedimus justice, the Secretary of State shall remove the name of that dedimus justice
from the roster required by this subsection.